Maryland, session 2026, HB1198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
SUBTITLE 27. COERCED DEBT – DEBTOR PROTECTIONS.
3–2701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “ADEQUATE DOCUMENTATION” MEANS A WRITING THAT:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1198*

HOUSE BILL 1198
(I) IDENTIFIES A DEBT AS A COERCED DEBT; AND
(II) DESCRIBES THE CIRCUMSTANCES UNDER WHICH THE
COERCED DEBT WAS INCURRED.
(2) “ADEQUATE DOCUMENTATION” INCLUDES:
(I) A POLICE REPORT;
(II) A FEDERAL TRADE COMMISSION IDENTITY THEFT REPORT;
(III) AN ORDER FROM A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION
FINDING THE DEBT TO BE A COERCED DEBT; AND
(IV) A SWORN, WRITTEN CERTIFICATION FROM A QUALIFIED
THIRD PARTY TO WHICH THE DEBTOR REPORTED THE CIRCUMSTANCES GIVING RISE
TO THE COERCED DEBT.
(C) (1) “COERCED DEBT” MEANS ALL OR A PART OF A DEBT IN THE
DEBTOR’S NAME INCURRED AS A RESULT OF FRAUD, DURESS, INTIMIDATION,
THREAT, FORCE, COERCION, MANIPULATION, UNDUE INFLUENCE,
MISINFORMATION, OR THE NONCONSENSUAL USE OF THE DEBTOR’S PERSONAL
IDENTIFYING INFORMATION, THAT OCCURS WITHIN THE CONTEXT OF:
(I) ABUSE, AS DEFINED IN § 4–501 OF THE FAMILY LAW
ARTICLE;
(II) EXPLOITATION OF CHILDREN IN AN OUT–OF–HOME
PLACEMENT, AS DEFINED IN § 5–501 OF THE FAMILY LAW ARTICLE;
(III) FINANCIAL EXPLOITATION, AS DEFINED IN § 13–601 OF THE
ESTATES AND TRUSTS ARTICLE;
(IV) HARASSMENT UNDER § 3–803 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE;
(V) HUMAN TRAFFICKING UNDER TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 11 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE; OR
(VI) LABOR TRAFFICKING UNDER § 3–1202 OF THE CRIMINAL
LAW ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 1198 3
(2) “COERCED DEBT” DOES NOT INCLUDE A DEBT SECURED BY REAL
PROPERTY.
(D) “CONSUMER REPORTING AGENCY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
14–1201 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
(E) “CREDITOR” MEANS A PERSON, OR THE PERSON’S SUCCESSOR,
ASSIGNEE, OR AGENT, CLAIMING TO OWN OR HAVE THE RIGHT TO COLLECT A DEBT
OWED BY THE DEBTOR.
(F) “DEBTOR” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO OWES A DEBT.
(G) “QUALIFIED THIRD PARTY” MEANS:
(1) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER;
(2) A LICENSED HEALTH CARE PROVIDER;
(3) A LICENSED MENTAL HEALTH CARE PROVIDER;
(4) A LICENSED SOCIAL WORKER;
(5) A LICENSED CLINICAL MARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPIST; OR
(6) AN EMPLOYEE OF A DOMESTIC VIOLENCE PROGRAM THAT
RECEIVES FUNDING FROM THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF CRIME PREVENTION AND
POLICY.
3–2702.
(A) (1) BEFORE FILING A CIVIL ACTION UNDER § 3–2703 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, A DEBTOR SHALL NOTIFY A CREDITOR THAT A DEBT ON WHICH THE
CREDITOR DEMANDS PAYMENT IS COERCED DEBT AND REQUEST THAT THE
CREDITOR CEASE ALL DEBT COLLECTION ACTIVITY ON THE COERCED DEBT.
(2) NOTICE PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) BE IN WRITING;
(II) INCLUDE ADEQUATE DOCUMENTATION; AND
(III) BE SUBMITTED:

HOUSE BILL 1198
1. BY MAIL;
2. BY E–MAIL;
3. BY FAX; OR
4. ONLINE OR THROUGH OTHER ELECTRONIC MEANS.
(3) A CREDITOR SHALL MAKE INFORMATION ON HOW A DEBTOR CAN
SUBMIT A NOTICE UNDER THIS SECTION PUBLICLY AVAILABLE ONLINE AND ON
REQUEST VIA ANY PUBLICLY AVAILABLE METHOD OF COMMUNICATION.
(4) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPHS (II) AND (III) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, NOTICE SUBMITTED BY A DEBTOR IS CONSIDERED RECEIVED THE
SAME DAY THE DEBTOR SUBMITS THE NOTICE.
(II) NOTICE SUBMITTED BY MAIL IS CONSIDERED RECEIVED 3
DAYS AFTER THE NOTICE WAS POSTMARKED.
(III) NOTICE SUBMITTED WITHOUT ADEQUATE
DOCUMENTATION IS CONSIDERED RECEIVED THE DAY THAT THE ADEQUATE
DOCUMENTATION IS PROVIDED TO THE CREDITOR.
(B) (1) ON RECEIPT OF NOTICE PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION, A CREDITOR SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE THE DEBTOR WITH WRITTEN CONFIRMATION
THAT THE CREDITOR HAS RECEIVED THE NOTICE, INCLUDING IDENTIFICATION OF
THE DATE THE NOTICE WAS CONSIDERED RECEIVED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(4) OF
THIS SECTION;
(II) INFORM THE DEBTOR OF ANY MISSING DOCUMENTATION
REQUIRED TO REVIEW THE NOTICE, IF APPLICABLE; AND
(III) INFORM A CONSUMER REPORTING AGENCY THAT THE DEBT
IS DISPUTED.
(2) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING NOTICE UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION, A CREDITOR SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE
DEBTOR OF THE CREDITOR’S DECISION TO CONTINUE OR CEASE DEBT COLLECTION
ACTIVITY RELATING TO THE COERCED DEBT.

HOUSE BILL 1198 5
(3) A NOTICE UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION OF A
CREDITOR’S DECISION TO RESUME DEBT COLLECTION SHALL STATE THE DATE ON
WHICH THE CREDITOR WILL RESUME DEBT COLLECTION ACTIVITY, WHICH MAY BE
NOT EARLIER THAN 40 DAYS AFTER THE CREDITOR RECEIVED NOTICE UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(4) FOLLOWING NOTICE UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION OF A DECISION TO CEASE DEBT COLLECTION ACTIVITY, A CREDITOR:
(I) SHALL:
1. CEASE ALL DEBT COLLECTION ACTIVITY, INCLUDING
WAGE GARNISHMENT;
2. REPORT TO A CONSUMER REPORTING AGENCY THE
DELETION OF THE COERCED DEBT; AND
3. MOVE TO DISMISS ANY ACTION IN A COURT TO
ENFORCE COLLECTION ACTIVITY ON THE COERCED DEBT; AND
(II) MAY RESUME DEBT COLLECTION ACTIVITY ON THE
COERCED DEBT ONLY AFTER PROVIDING WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE DEBTOR AT
LEAST 10 DAYS BEFORE RESUMING DEBT COLLECTION ACTIVITY.
(C) A CREDITOR MAY SELL OR ASSIGN TO ANOTHER PARTY A DEBT THAT A
DEBTOR HAS ASSERTED IS COERCED DEBT IF THE CREDITOR SELLING OR ASSIGNING
THE DEBT NOTIFIES THE BUYER OR ASSIGNEE THAT THE DEBTOR HAS ASSERTED
THE DEBT IS COERCED DEBT.
(D) A CREDITOR CEASING DEBT COLLECTION ACTIVITY ON A DEBT THAT A
DEBTOR HAS ASSERTED IS A COERCED DEBT DOES NOT CREATE A PRESUMPTION
REGARDING THE VALIDITY OR INVALIDITY OF THE DEBT FOR WHICH THE DEBTOR
MAY BE LIABLE.
(E) A DEBTOR MAY NOT FILE AN ACTION UNDER § 3–2703 OF THIS SUBTITLE
EARLIER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER PROVIDING A CREDITOR WITH NOTICE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
3–2703.
(A) A DEBTOR ALLEGING A DEBT IS COERCED DEBT MAY SEEK EQUITABLE
RELIEF IN A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION, INCLUDING:

HOUSE BILL 1198
(1) A DECLARATORY JUDGMENT THAT A DEBT IS A COERCED DEBT;
(2) AN INJUNCTION PROHIBITING A CREDITOR FROM:
(I) HOLDING THE DEBTOR LIABLE FOR THE COERCED DEBT;
(II) ENFORCING A JUDGMENT RELATED TO THE COERCED
DEBT; OR
(III) REPORTING THE COERCED DEBT TO A CONSUMER
REPORTING AGENCY;
(3) AN ORDER DISMISSING WITH PREJUDICE ANY CAUSE OF ACTION
BROUGHT BY A CREDITOR TO ENFORCE OR COLLECT THE COERCED DEBT FROM THE
DEBTOR; AND
(4) AN ORDER REQUIRING A CREDITOR TO REPORT TO A CONSUMER
REPORTING AGENCY THE DELETION OF THE COERCED DEBT.
(B) A DEBTOR MAY FILE A PETITION UNDER THIS SECTION NOT EARLIER
THAN 30 DAYS AFTER A CREDITOR HAS RECEIVED NOTICE UNDER § 3–2702 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(C) (1) A PETITION FOR EQUITABLE RELIEF FILED UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL CONTAIN:
(I) EVIDENCE THAT THE DEBTOR PROVIDED NOTICE TO A
CREDITOR REQUIRED UNDER § 3–2702 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) INFORMATION IDENTIFYING:
1. THE ACCOUNT ASSOCIATED WITH THE COERCED
DEBT;
2. THE INDIVIDUAL IN WHOSE NAME THE COERCED
DEBT WAS INCURRED; AND
3. THE INDIVIDUAL WHO CAUSED THE DEBTOR TO
INCUR THE ALLEGED COERCED DEBT INCLUDING, IF KNOWN, THE INDIVIDUAL’S
CONTACT INFORMATION.
(D) (1) A PETITIONER IS NOT REQUIRED TO PROVIDE INFORMATION
UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(1)(II)3 OF THIS SECTION IF THE PETITIONER SIGNS A

HOUSE BILL 1198 7
SWORN STATEMENT ATTESTING THAT DISCLOSURE IS LIKELY TO RESULT IN ABUSE
OF OR HARM TO THE PETITIONER, OR HARM TO THE PETITIONER’S FAMILY OR PET.
(2) THE COURT SHALL TAKE APPROPRIATE STEPS NECESSARY TO
PREVENT ABUSE OF OR HARM TO THE DEBTOR, OR HARM TO THE DEBTOR’S FAMILY
OR THE DEBTOR’S PET.
(3) APPROPRIATE STEPS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY INCLUDE
SHIELDING OF CASE FILES, REDACTING PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION,
OR REQUIRING DEPOSITIONS AND EVIDENTIARY HEARINGS TO BE CONDUCTED
REMOTELY.
(E) (1) IN AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION, A DEBTOR HAS THE BURDEN
OF PROOF TO SHOW THAT NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER § 3–2702 OF THIS SUBTITLE
WAS PROVIDED TO THE CREDITOR.
(2) ONCE A DEBTOR MEETS THE BURDEN OF PROOF UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A CREDITOR HAS THE BURDEN OF PROOF TO
SHOW THAT THE DEBTOR DID NOT ALLEGE IN GOOD FAITH THAT THE DEBT WAS
COERCED.
3–2704.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT A CREDITOR FROM
PURSUING AN ACTION AGAINST AN INDIVIDUAL ALLEGED TO HAVE CAUSED A
DEBTOR TO INCUR COERCED DEBT.
3–2705.
IF A DEBTOR RECEIVES A DECLARATORY JUDGMENT THAT A DEBT IS A
COERCED DEBT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, A DEBTOR MAY SEEK RELIEF IN A COURT OF
COMPETENT JURISDICTION AGAINST AN INDIVIDUAL ALLEGED TO HAVE CAUSED A
COERCED DEBT, INCLUDING:
(1) DAMAGES IN THE AMOUNT OF PAYMENTS MADE OR COSTS
INCURRED RELATED TO THE COERCED DEBT;
(2) ATTORNEY’S FEES; AND
(3) COURT COSTS.
3–2706.

HOUSE BILL 1198
IN AN ACTION AGAINST A DEBTOR TO SATISFY A DEBT, IT IS AN AFFIRMATIVE
DEFENSE THAT THE DEBT IS A COERCED DEBT.
3–2707.
AN AGREEMENT BETWEEN A DEBTOR AND ANY OTHER PERSON TO WAIVE OR
MODIFY A RIGHT CONFERRED OR CAUSE OF ACTION CREATED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE IS VOID AS CONTRARY TO PUBLIC POLICY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application of any provision of this Act to any person or circumstance is held invalid for
any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or any other application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared
severable.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.